Maine, session 132, LD1903.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA §320-K, sub-§1, ¶C-1 is enacted to read:
C-1. "Contaminated by PFAS" or "PFAS contamination" means:
(1) For perfluorooctane sulfonic acid, the presence of perfluorooctane sulfonic
acid in an amount exceeding a soil concentration level of 0.13 milligrams per
kilogram;
(2) For perfluorooctanoic acid, the presence of perfluorooctanoic acid in an
amount exceeding a soil concentration level of 0.19 milligrams per kilogram; and
(3) For any PFAS other than those listed in subparagraphs (1) and (2), the presence
of such PFAS in an amount exceeding a soil concentration level contained in
guidance promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §2611, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Maximum contaminant levels for certain perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl
substances. The primary drinking water rules adopted and enforced by the commissioner
pursuant to subsection 1 must specify for the following perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl
substances a maximum contaminant level equivalent to the national primary drinking water
regulations, 40 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 141, adopted by the United States
Environmental Protection Agency in April 2024:
A. Perfluorooctanoic acid, also known as PFOA;
B. Perfluorohexane sulfonic acid, also known as PFHxS;
C. Perfluorooctane sulfonic acid, also known as PFOS;
D. Perfluorononanoic acid, also known as PFNA;
E. Hexafluoropropylene oxide dimer acid, also known as HFPO-DA; and
F. Mixtures containing 2 or more of the following: PFHxS, PFNA, HFPO-DA and
perfluorobutane sulfonic acid, also known as PFBS.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §1733, sub-§3-B, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 277, §3, is amended
to read:
3-B. Prohibition of sale of food package containing PFAS. In accordance with the
requirements of this subsection, except as otherwise provided, the department may by rule
prohibit a manufacturer, supplier or distributor from offering for sale or for promotional
purposes in the State a food package to which PFAS have been intentionally introduced in
any amount greater than an incidental presence.
A. The department may not by rule prohibit the sale of a food package to which PFAS
have been intentionally introduced in any amount greater than an incidental presence
under this subsection unless the department has determined that a safer alternative to
the use of PFAS in a specific application of PFAS to a food package is available. To
determine that a safer alternative is available, the department must find that a safer
alternative is readily available in sufficient quantity and at a comparable cost and that
the safer alternative performs as well as or better than PFAS in a specific application
of PFAS to a food package.
Page 1 - 132LR0437(01)

B. If the department determines pursuant to paragraph A that a safer alternative to the
use of PFAS in a specific application of PFAS to a food package is available, the
department shall by rule prohibit the sale of a food package to which PFAS have been
intentionally introduced in any amount greater than an incidental presence under this
subsection, except that such a prohibition may not take effect until January 1, 2022 or
2 years following the date on which the department determines that a safer alternative
is available, whichever is later.
The prohibition in this subsection does not prevent a manufacturer that is located in the
State from offering for sale or for promotional purposes outside the State a food package
to which PFAS have been intentionally introduced in any amount greater than an incidental
presence.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are major substantive rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Federal law or regulation regulating the sale of a food package to which PFAS have been
intentionally added preempts state authority under this subsection.
Sec. 4. 38 MRSA §420, sub-§2, ¶C-1 is enacted to read:
C-1. If surface water quality standards for PFAS are established pursuant to federal
law, including the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, Public Law 92-500, Section
304(a), as amended, the department shall adopt rules for surface water quality standards
to match the federal water quality standards. For the purposes of this paragraph,
"PFAS" has the same meaning as in section 1614, subsection 1, paragraph F.
Sec. 5. 38 MRSA §585-P is enacted to read:
§585-P. Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances
If the United States Environmental Protection Agency adopts emissions standards for
PFAS, emissions standards for PFAS adopted by the board must be the same as the
emissions standards established by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.
For the purposes of this section, "PFAS" has the same meaning as in section 1614,
subsection 1, paragraph F.